Utah statutes.
47-2-3.   Abandoned horses on open range declared a nuisance.
It shall be unlawful for any person to suffer or permit any abandoned horse to
run at large upon the open range, and every abandoned horse is declared to be
a public nuisance and a public menace, and is condemned subject to the right
of its owner to reclaim it under the conditions hereinafter provided.
